Vermont statutes. Title 14 Decedents’ Estates and Fiduciary Relations
Chapter 85. General Principles

§ 1971.
Intentional killing; offender not to benefit.

The acquisition of any property, interest, power, or benefit by a person as the result of the person’s commission of an intentional and unlawful killing shall be treated in accordance with the principle that a killer cannot profit from his or her wrong, and a court shall have the power to distribute, reform, revoke, or otherwise dispose of such property, interest, power, or benefit in accord with the principles of this section.

The distribution, reformation, revocation, or disposition of any property, interest, power, or benefit subject to subsection (a) of this section shall not affect any valid liens or mortgages on such property, interest, power, or benefit.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 55

, § 3.